Nebraska statutes.
Section 1.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-283
Legislative findings.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the practice of reusing ground water from irrigation water reuse pits on irrigated land contributes to the efficient use and conservation of the state's water resources and that such reuse may be more feasible when done from irrigation water reuse pits located within ephemeral natural streams.

Laws 1980, LB 908, § 1;

Laws 2008, LB798, § 1.